Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Protection for
Oklahoma Insurance Policyholders Act of 2026".
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 1250.3, is
amended to read as follows:


Req. No. 16309 Page 2

Section 1250.3. A. The provisions of the Unfair Claims
Settlement Practices Act shall apply to all claims arising under an
insurance policy or insurance contract issued by any insurer.
B. It is an unfair claim settlement practice for any insurer to
commit any act set out in Section 1250.5 of this title, or to commit
a violation of any other provision of the Unfair Claims Settlement
Practices Act, if:
1. It is committed flagrantly and in conscious disregard of
this act or any rules promulgated hereunder; or
2. It has been committed with such frequency as to indicate a
general business practice to engage in that type of conduct.
C. Artificial Intelligence (AI) shall not be used by any
insurer to deny any claim covered by the Unfair Claims Settlement
Practices Act. This prohibition shall include any type or function
of AI, including Artificial Narrow Intelligence, Artificial General
Intelligence, Reactive Machines, and Limited Memory AI.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 1435.3, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 225, O.S.L. 2022 (36 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1435.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1435.3. A. Every insurance producer, as defined
pursuant to paragraph 7 of Section 1435.2 of this title, or limited
lines producer who solicits or negotiates an application for
insurance of any kind shall, subject to subsections D, E, and F of
this section, in any controversy between the insured or the
Req. No. 16309 Page 3

insu red's beneficiary and the insurer, be regarded as representing
the insurer and not the insured or the insured's beneficiary. This
provision shall not affect the apparent authority of an insurance
producer.
B. Every surplus lines insurance broker who solicits an
application for insurance of any kind shall, in any controversy
between the insured or the insured's beneficiary and the insurer
issuing any policy upon such application, be regarded as
representing the insured or the insured's beneficiary and not the
insurer. Any company which directly or through its agents delivers
in this state to any insurance broker, a policy of insurance
pursuant to the application or request of such broker, acting for an
insured other than himself or herself, shall be deemed to have
authorized such broker to receive on its behalf, payment of any
premium which is due on such policy of insurance at the time of its
issuance or delivery.
C. Every licensed insurance producer shall be entitled to
commissions on all premiums collected for group insurance policies
negotiated by the insurance producer on behalf of an insurer and an
insurer shall be required to pay such commissions to the insurance
producer, except entitlement to commissions shall automatically
terminate without notice, effective on the date of the occurrence of
any of the following events:

Req. No. 16309 Page 4

1. The insurance producer's license to engage in accident and
health insurance business is terminated or revoked by this state or
any other public authority for cause. As used in this paragraph,
"cause" shall be defined as perpetration by the insurance producer
of fraud or embezzlement;
2. Material breach of the insurance producer's contract with
the account or insurer, excluding production requirements;
3. Termination of the insurance producer's "Agent of Record"
relationship with the employer or account; or
4. Death of the insurance producer, unless the contract between
the insurer states otherwise or the right to the commission has
vested.
Recovery of such commissions shall be through civil action. In any
action brought pursuant to this subsection, the court may award
reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing party.
D. An insurance producer shall exercise care owed as a
fiduciary in renewing, procuring, binding, or placing the coverage
requested by the insured or proposed insured.
E. No cause of action brought by any person or entity against
any insurance producer concerning the sale, placement, procurement,
renewal, binding, cancellation of, or failure to procure any policy
of insurance shall subject the insurance producer to civil liability
unless it is proved by a preponderance of the evidence that the

Req. No. 16309 Page 5

fidu ciary relationship between a policyholder and producer has been
violated.
F. While limiting the scope of liability of an insurance
producer under standards governing the conduct of a fiduciary or a
fiduciary relationship, the provisions of this Section do not limit
or release an insurance producer from liability for negligence
concerning the sale, placement, procurement, renewal, binding,
cancellation of, or failure to procure any policy of insurance.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 982, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 982. Definitions.
As used in the Property and Casualty Competitive Loss Cost
Rating Act:
1. "Accepted actuarial standards" means the standards adopted
by the Casualty Actuarial Society Statement of Principles regarding
property and casualty ratemaking or the Standards of Practice
adopted by the Actuarial Standards Board;
2. "Advisory organization" means any corporation,
unincorporated association, partnership or person, whether located
inside or outside this state, that is licensed in accordance with
Section 1140 of this title and which assists insurers in ratemaking-
related activities such as enumerated in Section 1142 of this title;


Req. No. 16309 Page 6

3. "Classification system" or "classification" means the
process of grouping risks with similar risk characteristics so that
differences in costs may be recognized;
4. "Commercial risk" means any kind of risk that is not a
personal risk;
5. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Insurance of this
state;
6. "Competitive market" means a market which has not been found
to be noncompetitive pursuant to Section 984 of this title;
7. "Developed losses" means losses, including loss adjustment
expenses, adjusted using accepted actuarial standards, to eliminate
the effect of differences between current payment or reserve
estimates and those which are anticipated to provide actual ultimate
loss, including loss adjustment expense payments;
8. "Expenses" means that portion of a rate attributable to
acquisition, field supervision, collection expenses, general
expenses, taxes, licenses and fees;
9. "Experience rating" means a rating procedure utilizing past
insurance experience of the individual policyholder to forecast
future losses by measuring the policyholder's loss experience
against the loss experience of policyholders in the same
classification to produce a prospective premium credit, debit or
unity modification;

Req. No. 16309 Page 7

10. "Intervenor" means the Attorney General or any consumer or
policyholder who has an interest in or is aggrieved by a filing to
change insurance rates in this state;
11. "Joint underwriting" means a voluntary arrangement
established to provide insurance coverage for a risk pursuant to
which two or more insurers jointly contract with the insured at a
price and under policy terms agreed upon between the insurers;
11. 12. "Loss adjustment expense" means the expenses incurred
by the insurer in the course of settling claims;
12. 13. "Market" means the statewide interaction between buyers
and sellers of identical or readily substitutable products that
provide insurance protection of identifiable perils to buyers;
13. 14. "Mass marketed plan" means a method of selling
property-liability insurance wherein the insurance is offered to
employees of particular employers or to members of particular
associations or organizations or to persons grouped in other ways,
and the employer or association or other organization has agreed to,
or otherwise affiliated itself with, the sale of such insurance to
its employees or members;
14. 15. "Noncompetitive market" means a market for which there
is a ruling in effect pursuant to Section 984 of this title that a
reasonable degree of competition does not exist;
15. 16. "Personal risk" means homeowners, tenants, private
passenger nonfleet automobiles, manufactured homes and other
Req. No. 16309 Page 8

prop erty and casualty insurance for personal, family or household
needs, including any property and casualty insurance that is
otherwise intended for noncommercial coverage;
16. 17. "Pool" means a voluntary arrangement, established on an
ongoing basis, pursuant to which two or more insurers participate in
the sharing of risks on a predetermined basis. The pool may operate
through an association, syndicate or other pooling agreement;
17. 18. "Prospective loss costs" means historical aggregate
losses and may include loss adjustment expenses, including all
assessments that are loss based, projected through development to
their ultimate value and through trending to a future point in time;
18. 19. "Pure premium rate" means that portion of the rate
which represents the loss costs per unit of exposure including loss
adjustment expense;
19. 20. "Rate" or "rates" means that cost of insurance per
exposure unit whether expressed as a single number or as a
prospective loss cost with an adjustment to account for the
treatment of expenses, profit, and individual insurer variation in
loss experience, prior to any application of individual risk
variations based on loss or expense considerations, and does not
include minimum premium;
20. 21. "Residual market mechanism" means an arrangement,
either voluntary or mandated by law, involving participation by
insurers in the equitable apportionment among them of insurance
Req. No. 16309 Page 9

whic h may be afforded applicants who are unable to obtain insurance
through ordinary methods;
21. 22. "Special assessments" means guaranty fund assessments,
Special Indemnity Fund assessments, Vocational Rehabilitation Fund
assessments, and other similar assessments. Special assessments
shall not be considered as either expenses or losses;
22. 23. "Statistical plan" means the plan, system or
arrangement used in collecting data;
23. 24. "Supplementary rating information" means any manual or
plan of rates, classification, rating schedule, minimum premium,
policy fee rating rule and any other information needed to determine
the applicable premium in effect or to be in effect. This includes,
rating plans, territory codes and descriptions and rules which
include factors or relativities such as increased limits factors,
deductible discounts or relativities, classification relativities or
similar factors used to determine the rate in effect or to be in
effect;
24. 25. "Supporting information" means the experience and
judgment of the filer and the experience or data of other insurers
or advisory organizations relied upon by the filer, the
interpretation of any other data relied upon by the filer,
descriptions of methods used in making the rates and any other
information required by the Commissioner to be filed; and

Req. No. 16309 Page 10

25. 26. "Trending" means any procedure for projecting losses to
the average date of loss, or premiums or exposures to the average
date of writing, for the period during which the policies are to be
effective.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 987, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 987. Rate Filings.
A. In a competitive market, every insurer shall file with the
Commissioner all rates and supplementary rate information to be used
in this state no later than thirty (30) days after the effective
date; provided, that the rates and supplementary rate information
need not be filed for commercial risks, which by general custom are
not written according to manual rules or rating plans. The
application for a rate change shall not be approved until a hearing,
as provided for by subsections I and J of this section, is held to
determine the necessity of the rate change. The Commissioner may
declare a hearing is not necessary if the Attorney General or an
intervenor does not file an objection to the rate filing within
thirty (30) days of the date of filing and notice to the Attorney
General and the public as required by this act.
B. In a noncompetitive market, every insurer shall file with
the Commissioner all rates, supplementary rate information and
supporting information at least thirty (30) days before the proposed
effective date. The Commissioner may give written notice, within
Req. No. 16309 Page 11

thir ty (30) days of receipt of the filing, that the Commissioner
needs additional time, not to exceed thirty (30) days from the date
of the notice to consider the filing. Upon written application of
the insurer, the Commissioner may authorize rates to be effective
before the expiration of the waiting period or an extension thereof.
A filing shall be deemed to meet the requirements of the Property
and Casualty Competitive Loss Cost Rating Act and to become
effective unless disapproved pursuant to this title by the
Commissioner before the expiration of the waiting period or an
extension thereof.
In a noncompetitive market, the filing shall be deemed in
compliance with the filing provision of this section unless the
Commissioner informs the insurer within ten (10) days after receipt
of the filings as to what supplementary rate information or
supporting information is required to complete the filing.
C. Every authorized insurer shall file with the Commissioner,
except as to rates for those lines of insurance exempted from the
provisions of the Property and Casualty Competitive Loss Cost Rating
Act by the Commissioner under subsections E and F of this section
and except for those risks designated as special risks under Section
997 of this title, all rates, supplementary rate information and any
changes and amendments which it proposes to use. An insurer shall
specify loss expenses incurred only in this state. An insurer may
file its rates by either filing its final rates or by filing a
Req. No. 16309 Page 12

mult iplier and, if applicable, an expense constant adjustment to be
applied to prospective loss costs that have been filed by an
advisory organization as permitted by this title. Such loss cost
multiplier filing and expense constant filings made by insurers
shall remain in effect until amended or withdrawn by the insurer.
Every filing shall state the effective date.
D. Under rules as may be adopted, the Commissioner may, by
written order, suspend or modify the requirement of filing as to any
kind of insurance, subdivision or combination thereof, or as to
classes of risks.
E. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Property and
Casualty Competitive Loss Cost Rating Act, upon the written consent
of the insured in a separate written document, a rate in excess of
that determined in accordance with the other provisions of the
Property and Casualty Competitive Loss Cost Rating Act may be used
on a specific risk.
F. A filing and any supporting information required to be filed
shall be open to public inspection once the filing becomes effective
except information marked confidential, trade secret, or proprietary
by the insurer or filer and except the filings of an advisory
organization which shall be open to public inspection upon the
received date of the rate, loss cost, or manual rule change. The
insurer or filer shall have the burden of asserting to the
Commissioner that a filing and supporting information are
Req. No. 16309 Page 13

conf idential, upon the request of the Commissioner. The
Commissioner may disapprove of the insurer's request for
confidential filing status.
G. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Property and
Casualty Competitive Loss Cost Rating Act, the filer in either a
competitive or noncompetitive market shall have the burden of
proving that the rate change is justified and is in compliance with
Oklahoma's Insurance Statutes. The Commissioner shall actuarily
evaluate the rate change.
H. The Commissioner shall notify the Attorney General and post
on the official Website of the Oklahoma Insurance Department
information about any application by an insurer for a rate change.
I. Any person or policyholder aggrieved or affected with
respect to a rate filing shall be allowed to intervene and
participate in any hearing called by the Commissioner. The
intervenor shall be allowed to appear in person or by counsel.
J. At a hearing with respect to a rate filing, the Attorney
General or any intervenor shall be allowed to obtain sworn testimony
from a representative or representatives of the insurer, including
any actuary submitting a report in the rate filing. The Attorney
General or intervenor as provided for in subsection C shall have the
right to subpoena witnesses for such hearing. In the event an
intervenor's effort result in a substantial reduction in the
proposed insurance rate increase, the intervenor shall be awarded
Req. No. 16309 Page 14

cost s and attorney's fees to be paid by the insurer. Reasonable
advocacy and witness fees and expenses may be awarded to any person
who demonstrates that the person represents the interests of
consumers, and has made a substantial contribution to the adoption
of any order, regulation, or decision be the Commissioner or court.
Where such advocacy occurs in response to a rate change filing, the
award shall be paid by the filer. If any party in interest or
intervenor is aggrieved by a district court order, the order may be
appealed to the Oklahoma Supreme Court as provided by law. The
rules of evidence prescribed by the Oklahoma Administrative
Procedures Act shall be observed at all hearings.
K. Within one hundred and eighty (180) days after the filing of
a rate change, a policyholder of the insurer making the rate change
filing may file a Declaratory Judgment action pursuant to Section
1651 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes in the District Court of
Oklahoma County to determine the necessity and appropriateness of
the rate change. The policyholder shall be permitted to conduct
discover pursuant to the Oklahoma Discovery Code, sections 3224
through 3237 of tile 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 902.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 902.2. A. The Insurance Commissioner when reviewing a
filing shall give due consideration to the following when, in its

Req. No. 16309 Page 15

disc retion, it determines that such factor or factors are
applicable:
1. Past loss experience within and outside this state;
2. Prospective loss experience within and outside this state;
3. Physical hazards insured;
4. Safety and loss prevention programs;
5. Underwriting practices and judgment;
6. Catastrophe hazards;
7. Reasonable underwriting profit and contingencies;
8. Dividends, savings or unabsorbed premium deposits allowed or
returned to policyholders;
9. Past expenses within and outside this state;
10. Prospective expenses within and outside this state;
11. Existence of classification rates for a given risk;
12. Investment income within and outside this state;
13. Rarity or peculiarity of the risks within and outside this
state;
14. In the case of workers' compensation rates, differences in
the hazard levels of different geographical regions of the state;
15. All other relevant factors within and outside this state;
and
16. Whether existing rates continue to meet the standards of
this article.

Req. No. 16309 Page 16

B. The Commissioner shall determine the weight to be accorded
each of the factors contained in subsection A of this section.
C. Past or prospective expenses within or outside this state
pursuant to paragraphs 9 and 10 of subsection A of this section
shall not include prohibited expenses for advertising or prohibited
expenses for membership in organizations.
For the purpose of this subsection:
1. "Prohibited expenses for advertising" means the cost of
advertising in any media the purpose of which is to influence
legislation or to advocate support for or opposition to a candidate
for public office;
2. "Prohibited expenses for advertising" shall not mean:
a. any communication to customers and the public of
information regarding an insurer's insurance products,
b. any communication to customers and the public of
safety, safety education or loss prevention
information,
c. periodic publications or reports to stockholders or
members required by the certificate or bylaws of the
insurer,
d. any communication with customers and the public which
provides instruction in the use of the insurer's
products and services, or

Req. No. 16309 Page 17

e. any communication with customers and the public for
giving notice or information required by law or
otherwise necessary;
3. "Prohibited expenses for membership" means the cost of
membership in any organization which conducts substantial efforts,
including but not limited to prohibited expenses for advertising,
the purpose of which is to influence legislation or to advocate
support for or opposition to a candidate for public office; and
4. "Prohibited expenses for membership" shall not mean the cost
of membership in advisory organizations or other organizations the
primary purpose of which is to provide statistical information on
losses.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 907.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 907.1. A. The Insurance Commissioner shall monitor and
examine the adequacy of rates of any insurer and advisory
organization in this state and the filing of any requested rate
change. In so doing, the Commissioner shall:
1. Utilize existing relevant information, analytical systems
and other sources; or and
2. Cause or participate in the development of new relevant
information, analytical systems and other sources. The Commissioner
shall employ or retain the services of an independent actuary or

Req. No. 16309 Page 18

actu aries to examine the information contained in the actuarial
report of the filer for a change in rates.
B. The Commissioner may require the maintenance and submission
of records, memoranda or information relating to rates from such
insurers and advisory organizations. The Commissioner or any
authorized representative of the Commissioner may examine any such
record, memoranda or information concerning rates. The application
for the acceptance of any license or permit issued pursuant to the
provision of this title shall be deemed consent for the inspection
and examination of such records, memoranda or information.
C. The Commissioner shall conduct such monitoring and
examination required pursuant to this section within the Insurance
Department, at the place of business of such insurers and advisory
organizations, in cooperation with other state insurance
departments, through outside contractors or in any other appropriate
manner.
D. The cost of such examination and monitoring shall be
assessed against insurers and advisory organizations on an equitable
and practical basis established, after hearing, in a rule
promulgated by the Commissioner.
E. The monitoring and examinations required pursuant to the
provisions of this section, shall be conducted in a reasonably
economical manner.

Req. No. 16309 Page 19

SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 1126, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1126. A. The Statement of Actuarial Opinion shall be
provided with the annual statement in accordance with the
appropriate National Associations of Insurance Commissioners
Property and Casualty Annual Statement Instructions and shall be
treated as a public document.
B. 1. Documents, materials or other information in the
possession or control of the Insurance Department that are
considered an actuarial report, work papers or actuarial opinion
summary provided in support of the opinion, and any other material
provided by the company to the Insurance Commissioner in connection
with the actuarial report, work papers or actuarial opinion summary,
and any work papers used by the Commissioner or any other person in
the analysis of the actuarial report, work papers, other material or
actuarial opinion summary provided in support of the opinion, shall
be confidential by law and privileged open to the public, shall not
be subject to the Oklahoma Open Records Act, shall not be subject to
subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or and admissible in
evidence in any private civil action. The confidentiality and
protection from discovery by subpoena provided in this paragraph
shall not be construed to be extended to identical, similar or other
related documents or information or to the work papers that are not

Req. No. 16309 Page 20

deem ed to be in the possession, custody or control of the
Commissioner.
2. This provision shall not be construed to limit the
Commissioner's authority to release the documents to the Actuarial
Board for Counseling and Discipline (ABCD) so long as the material
is required for the purpose of professional disciplinary proceedings
and the ABCD establishes procedures satisfactory to the Commissioner
for preserving the confidentiality of the documents, nor shall this
section be construed to limit the Commissioner's authority to use
the documents, materials or other information in furtherance of any
regulatory or legal action brought as part of the Commissioner's
official duties.
C. Neither the Commissioner nor any person who received
documents, materials or other information while acting under the
authority of the Commissioner shall be permitted or required to
testify in any private civil action concerning any confidential
documents, materials or information subject to subsection B of this
section.
D. In order to assist in the performance of the Commissioner's
duties, the Commissioner:
1. May share documents, materials or other information,
including the confidential and privileged documents, materials or
information subject to subsection B of this section with other
state, federal and international regulatory agencies, with the
Req. No. 16309 Page 21

Nati onal Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates
and subsidiaries, and with state, federal and international law
enforcement authorities; provided, that the recipient agrees to
maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the document,
material or other information and has the legal authority to
maintain confidentiality;
2. May receive documents, materials or information, including
otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials or
information, from the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and from
regulatory and law enforcement officials of other foreign or
domestic jurisdictions, and shall maintain as confidential or
privileged any document, material or information received with
notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged
under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the
document, material or information; and
3. May enter into agreements governing sharing and use of
information consistent with subsections B through D of this section.
E. No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of
confidentiality in the documents, materials or information shall
occur as a result of disclosure to the Commissioner under this
section or as a result of sharing as authorized in subsection D of
this section unless the documents, materials, or information are

Req. No. 16309 Page 22

desi gnated as open to the public consistent with subsections B
through D of this section.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 3617, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3617. No policy delivered or issued for delivery in
Oklahoma and covering a subject of insurance resident, located, or
to be performed in Oklahoma, shall contain any condition,
stipulation or agreement (1) requiring such policy to be construed
according to the laws of any other state or country, except as
necessary to meet the requirements of the motor vehicle financial
responsibility laws or compulsory disability benefit laws of such
other state or country, or (2) preventing the bringing of an action
against any such insurer for more than six (6) months after the
cause of action accrues, or (3) limiting the time within which an
action may be brought to a period of less than two (2) years from
the time the cause of action accrues in connection with all
insurances other than property and marine and transportation
insurances; in property and marine and transportation policies such
time shall not be limited to less than one (1) year from the date of
occurrence of the event resulting in the loss the limitations of
actions as provided by Section 95 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. Any such condition, stipulation or agreement shall be
void, but such voidance shall not affect the validity of the other
provisions of the policy.
Req. No. 16309 Page 23

SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 1250.7, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1250.7. A. Within sixty (60) days after receipt by a
property and casualty insurer of properly executed proofs of loss,
the first party claimant shall be advised of the acceptance or
denial of the claim by the insurer, or if further investigation is
necessary. No property and casualty insurer shall deny a claim
because of a specific policy provision, condition, or exclusion
unless reference to such provision, condition, or exclusion is
included in the denial. A denial shall be given to any claimant in
writing, and the claim file of the property and casualty insurer
shall contain a copy of the denial. If there is a reasonable basis
supported by specific information available for review by the
Commissioner that the first party claimant has fraudulently caused
or contributed to the loss, a property and casualty insurer shall be
relieved from the requirements of this subsection. In the event of
a weather-related catastrophe or a major natural disaster, as
declared by the Governor, the Insurance Commissioner may extend the
deadline imposed under this subsection an additional twenty (20)
days.
B. If a claim is denied for reasons other than those described
in subsection A of this section, and is made by any other means than
writing, an appropriate notation shall be made in the claim file of

Req. No. 16309 Page 24

the property and casualty insurer until such time as a written
confirmation can be made.
C. Every property and casualty insurer shall complete
investigation of a claim within sixty (60) days after notification
of proof of loss unless such investigation cannot reasonably be
completed within such time. If such investigation cannot be
completed, or if a property and casualty insurer needs more time to
determine whether a claim should be accepted or denied, it shall so
notify the claimant within sixty (60) days after receipt of the
proofs of loss, giving reasons why more time is needed. If the
investigation remains incomplete, a property and casualty insurer
shall, within sixty (60) days from the date of the initial
notification, send to such claimant a letter setting forth the
reasons additional time is needed for investigation. Except for an
investigation of possible fraud or arson which is supported by
specific information giving a reasonable basis for the
investigation, the time for investigation shall not exceed one
hundred twenty (120) days after receipt of proof of loss. Provided,
in the event of a weather-related catastrophe or a major natural
disaster, as declared by the Governor, the Insurance Commissioner
may extend this deadline for investigation an additional twenty (20)
days.


Req. No. 16309 Page 25

D. Insurers shall not fail to settle first party claims on the
basis that responsibility for payment should be assumed by others
except as may otherwise be provided by policy provisions.
E. Insurers shall not continue or delay negotiations for
settlement of a claim directly with a claimant who is neither an
attorney nor represented by an attorney, for a length of time which
causes the claimant's rights to be affected by a statute of
limitations, or a policy or contract time limit, without giving the
claimant written notice that the time limit is expiring and may
affect the claimant's rights. Such notice shall be given to first
party claimants and third party claimants one year sixty (60) days
after the date of the loss before the expiration of a statute of
limitations.
F. No insurer shall make statements which indicate that the
rights of a third party claimant may be impaired if a form or
release is not completed within a given period of time unless the
statement is given for the purpose of notifying a third party
claimant of the provision of a statute of limitations.
G. If a lawsuit on the claim is initiated, the time limits
provided for in this section shall not apply.
H. As a matter of public policy, in no event shall an insurer
provide in a contract of insurance a statute of limitations that is
less than the general limitation of actions as provided by Section
95 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Any such condition,
Req. No. 16309 Page 26

stip ulation, or agreement shall be void, but such voidance shall not
affect the validity of the other provisions of the policy.
SECTION 11. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 1250.14, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1250.14. A. For any violation of the Unfair Claims
Settlement Practices Act, the Insurance Commissioner may, after
notice and hearing, subject an insurer to a civil penalty of not
less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00) for each occurrence. Such civil penalty may be
enforced in the same manner in which civil judgments may be
enforced.
B. In addition to the civil penalty enforceable by the
Insurance Commissioner, an insurer may be liable to a first-party
insured for the insurer's violation of one or more provisions of the
Unfair Claims Settlement Practices Act. Provided, the insurer shall
not be subject to a judgment in district court unless the insured
proves by a preponderance of evidence that damages claimed are a
proximate result of the violation or violations of the Unfair Claims
Settlement Practices Act.
SECTION 12. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16309 MJ 02/12/26


Req. No. 16309 Page 27